Utah statutes.
41-6a-1107.   Bicycles -- Parking on sidewalk, roadway -- Prohibitions.
(1)  A person may park a bicycle on a sidewalk unless prohibited or restricted
by a traffic-control device.
(2)  A bicycle parked on a sidewalk may not impede the normal and reasonable
movement of pedestrian or other traffic.
(3)  A bicycle may be parked on the roadway at any location where parking is
allowed:
(a)  at any angle to the curb or edge of the roadway; and
(b) abreast of another bicycle or bicycles near the side of the roadway.
(4)  A bicycle may not be parked on a roadway in a manner as to obstruct the
movement of a legally parked motor vehicle.
(5)  In all other respects, bicycles parked anywhere on a highway shall
conform with the provisions of Part 14, Stopping, Standing, and Parking,
regarding the parking of vehicles.
